North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 3. National Guard.

§ 127A-29.
National Guard.

The North Carolina National Guard class of the four classes of the organized militia as established under

G.S. 127A-2

is hereby designated the “North Carolina National Guard.” Those elements of the North Carolina National Guard which receive federal recognition by the United States government shall hold a dual status both as State troops and as a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States. In its federal status, the North Carolina National Guard shall be subject to federal laws and regulations pertaining thereto. The Adjutant General shall insure compliance with those federal laws and regulations and with all State laws and orders of the Governor not inconsistent with them.

History.

1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the first sentence, inserted the first occurrence of “North Carolina” and made a minor stylistic change, in the second sentence, substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed forces,” and in the last sentence, made minor stylistic changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Armed Forces Mobilizations Under 10 U.S.C. § 12301(d) and Federal Employees: Why OPM Guidance is Incorrect,” see 42 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (2020).

§ 127A-30.
Organization of National Guard units.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by the laws of the United States, the organization of the North Carolina National Guard, including the composition of all its units, shall be the same as that which is or may hereafter be prescribed for the regular United States Army or Air Force subject in time of peace to general exceptions authorized by the Secretary of Defense.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 7; C.S., s. 6808; 1959, c. 218, s. 4; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina,” substituted “United States Army or Air Force” for “army or air force,” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-31.
Location of units.

The Governor shall determine and fix the location of the units and headquarters of the North Carolina National Guard within the State; but no organization of the North Carolina National Guard, members of which shall be entitled to and shall have received compensation under the provisions of the act of Congress approved June 3, 1916, as amended, shall be disbanded without the consent of the President, nor without that consent shall the commissioned or enlisted strength of any such organization be reduced below the minimum that is now or shall be hereafter prescribed therefor by the President.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 9; C.S., s. 6809; 1921, c. 120, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” twice.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, twice inserted “North Carolina” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-32.
Officers appointed and commissioned; oath of office.

All officers of the North Carolina National Guard shall be appointed and commissioned by the Governor as follows, viz.:

Except as otherwise specifically provided by the laws of the United States, the qualifications for appointment as an officer in the North Carolina National Guard shall be the same as those prescribed for the regular establishment, subject to general exceptions authorized by the Secretary of Defense.

Candidates for appointment shall make written application therefor on forms prescribed by the secretary of the appropriate service, to the Adjutant General, State of North Carolina, through command channels for comment by endorsements thereon.

No person shall hereafter be appointed an officer of the North Carolina National Guard unless the person has established to the satisfaction of a board of officers that person’s physical, moral, and professional qualifications to perform the duties of the grade and position for which examined, subject to general exceptions authorized by the Secretary of Defense. The board shall consist of three or more commissioned officers of the appropriate service, appointed under regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service.

Candidates appointed as officers of the North Carolina National Guard shall take and subscribe to the following oath of office:“I, (First Name — Middle Name — Last Name), do solemnly swear that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of North Carolina against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I will obey orders of the President of the United States and of the Governor of the State of North Carolina; that I make this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion, and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office of (Grade) (Branch) in the National Guard of the State of North Carolina upon which I am about to enter, so help me God.”

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 15; C.S., s. 6811; 1921, c. 120, s. 3; 1959, c. 218, s. 5; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” throughout this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, throughout the section, inserted “North Carolina” preceding “National Guard” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-33.
Promotion of officers by seniority and in accordance with regulations.

The promotion of all officers shall be by seniority as far as practicable and in the best interest of the service within the organization, and in accordance with regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 17; C.S., s. 6814; 1921, c. 120, s. 4; 1959, c. 218, s. 7; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “as far as practicable and in the best interest” for “as far as the same is practicable and to the best interest.”

§ 127A-34.
Relative rank among officers of same grade.

Officers of the North Carolina National Guard in the same grade rank among themselves according to the date of rank established by regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service and the Adjutant General of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 19; C.S., s. 6816; 1921, c. 120, s. 5; 1927, c. 227, s. 1; 1959, c. 218, s. 8; 1961, c. 192, s. 2; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” near the beginning.

§ 127A-35.
Elimination and disposition of officers; efficiency board; transfer to inactive status.

Whenever the efficiency or general fitness, including physical fitness, of a North Carolina National Guard officer is in question, the Adjutant General, State of North Carolina, may order the officer to appear before an efficiency board to determine whether or not the appointment of the officer should be withdrawn. The efficiency board will be composed of not less than three commissioned officers, all senior in rank to the officer undergoing investigation. A member of the board serving in a legal or medical advisory capacity may be junior to any person, other than a judge advocate, law specialist, or medical officer being considered. The findings of an efficiency board are not final until reviewed and approved by the Secretary of Public Safety and the Governor of the State of North Carolina.

Commissions of officers of the North Carolina National Guard may be vacated upon resignation, absence without leave for 30 days, pursuant to sentence of a court martial, or pursuant to regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service.

Officers of the North Carolina National Guard may, upon their own request, be transferred to the inactive North Carolina National Guard, subject to exceptions authorized by the Adjutant General, State of North Carolina, or the Secretary of Defense.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 28; C.S., s. 6818; 1959, c. 218, s. 9; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” throughout this section.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in the last sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, throughout the section, inserted “North Carolina” preceding “National Guard”; in the first sentence of subsection (a) and in subsection (c), made minor stylistic changes; and in the last sentence of subsection (a), deleted “of the Department” following “Secretary.”

§ 127A-36.
Retirement of officers.

Retirement of officers shall be regulated so as to conform to federal laws and regulations of the United States relating to retirement of National Guard officers.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 29; C.S., s. 6819; 1949, c. 1130, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

§ 127A-37.
Enlistments in National Guard; oath of enlistment.

Enlistments in the North Carolina National Guard shall be for the periods and subject to the qualifications as prescribed by the secretary of the appropriate service.

Enlisted persons shall not be recognized as members of the North Carolina National Guard until they shall have subscribed to the following oath of enlistment:“I do hereby acknowledge to have voluntarily enlisted this _______________ day of _______________ , _______________ , in the (Army) (Air) National Guard of the State of North Carolina and as a Reserve of the (Army) (Air Force) with membership in the (Army National Guard of the United States) (Air National Guard of the United States) for a period of (Years — Months — Days) under the conditions prescribed by law, unless sooner discharged by proper authority.“I, (First Name — Middle Name — Last Name), do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and of the State of North Carolina against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to them; and that I will obey the orders of the President of the United States and the Governor of North Carolina and the orders of the officers appointed over me, according to law, regulations, and the Uniform Code of Military Justice, so help me God.”

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 30; C.S., s. 6820; 1921, c. 120, s. 6; 1957, c. 136, s. 6; 1959, c. 218, s. 10; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1999, c. 456, s. 59; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in subsection (a), and in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in subsections (a) and (b), inserted “North Carolina” preceding “National Guard”; in subsection (a), made minor stylistic changes; and in the introductory language of subsection (b), substituted “Enlisted persons” for “Enlisted men.”

§ 127A-38.
Discharge of enlisted personnel.

Enlisted personnel discharged from service in the North Carolina National Guard shall receive a discharge in writing in the form and with the classification that is or shall be prescribed under regulations promulgated by the appropriate service.

Discharges may be given prior to the expiration of terms of enlistment under regulations prescribed by the Adjutant General, State of North Carolina, or pursuant to regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 32; C.S., s. 6822; 1959, c. 218, s. 12; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina” in subsection (a); and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-39.
Membership continued in the National Guard.

When called or ordered into federal service and discharged therefrom, members shall continue their membership in the North Carolina National Guard until the expiration of their enlistment or appointment, unless sooner terminated by proper authority.

History.

1921, c. 120, s. 8; C.S., s. 6822(a); 1959, c. 218, s. 13; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina.”

§ 127A-40.
Pensions for the members of the North Carolina National Guard.

Every member and former member of the North Carolina National Guard who meets the requirements of this section shall receive, commencing at age 60, a pension of one hundred five dollars ($105.00) per month for 20 years’ creditable military service with an additional ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50) per month for each additional year of such service; provided, however, that the total pension shall not exceed two hundred ten dollars ($210.00) per month. The requirements for a pension are that each member shall:

Have served and qualified for at least 20 years’ creditable military service, including National Guard, reserve and active duty, under the same requirement specified for entitlement to retired pay for nonregular service under Chapter 67, Title 10, United States Code.

Have at least 15 years of the aforementioned service as a member of the North Carolina National Guard.

Have received an honorable discharge from the North Carolina National Guard.

Payment to a retired member of the North Carolina National Guard under the provisions of this section will cease at the death of the individual and no payment will be made to beneficiaries or to the decedent’s estate, except that the legal representative of a retired member who dies shall be entitled to a full check for the month in which the death occurred.

No individual receiving retired pay as a result of length of service, age or physical disability retirement from any of the regular components of the Armed Forces of the United States will be eligible for benefits under this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall preclude or in any way affect the benefits that an individual may be entitled to from State, federal or private retirement systems.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 792, s. 2.3.

The Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System shall administer the provisions of this section. The Secretary of Public Safety shall determine the eligibility of North Carolina National Guard members for the benefits provided in this section and shall certify those eligible to the Board of Trustees. In addition, the Department of Public Safety shall, on and after July 1, 1983, provide the Board of Trustees with an annual census population, by age and the number of years of creditable service, for all former members of the North Carolina National Guard in receipt of a pension as well as for all active members of the North Carolina National Guard who are not in receipt of a pension and who have seven and more years of creditable service. The Department of Public Safety shall also provide the Board of Trustees an annual census population of all former members of the North Carolina National Guard who are not in receipt of a pension and who have 15 and more years of creditable service. The Department of State Treasurer shall make pension payments to those persons certified from the North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any member or former member of the North Carolina National Guard who is qualified for the above retirements with eligibility commencing at age 60 or July 1, 1974, whichever is the later date.

If, for any reason, the North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund shall be insufficient to pay in full any pension benefits, or other charges, then all benefits or payments shall be reduced pro rata, for as long as the deficiency in amount exists. No claim shall accrue with respect to any amount by which a pension or benefit payment shall have been reduced.

(h1)

Any member or former member of the North Carolina National Guard who is qualified for benefits under this section and who is a member of a domiciled employees’ or retirees’ association that has at least 2,000 members, the majority of whom are active or retired employees of the State or public school employees, may authorize, in writing, the periodic deduction from the member’s retirement benefits a designated lump sum to be paid to the employees’ or retirees’ association. The authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the member. A plan of deductions pursuant to this subsection shall become void if the employees’ or retirees’ association engages in collective bargaining with the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any local school administrative unit.

Pensions for members of the North Carolina National Guard shall be subject to future legislative change or revision.

Except for the applications of the provisions of

G.S. 110-136

, and in connection with a court-ordered equitable distribution under

G.S. 50-20

, the pensions provided are not subject to attachment, garnishments, or judgments against the member or former member of the National Guard entitled to them, nor are any rights in the fund or the pensions or benefits assignable. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, any overpayment of benefits or erroneous payment to a member in a State-administered retirement system, the Disability Salary Continuation Plan, or the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina, including any benefits paid to, or State Health Plan premiums or claims paid on behalf of, any member who is later determined to have been ineligible for those benefits or unentitled to those amounts, may be offset against any retirement allowance, return of contributions, or any other right accruing under this Article to the same person, the person’s estate, or designated beneficiary.

History.

1973, c. 625, s. 1; c. 1241, ss. 1-3; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 1979, c. 870; 1983, c. 761, ss. 250, 251; 1989, c. 792, s. 2.3; 2002-126, s. 6.4(g); 2005-276, s. 29.27; 2006-66, s. 22.20; 2007-323, s. 28.21A; 2009-66, s. 10; 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-451, s. 26.21; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a); 2013-287, s. 3; 2014-100, s. 35.15C; 2015-241, s. 30.24; 2017-135, s. 9(d); 2020-48, s. 1.7(a).

§ 127A-40.1.
North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund.

As used in this section, the term “Board of Trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

The North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund shall include general fund appropriations made to the Department of State Treasurer and held with the Pension Accumulation Fund of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees shall have performed an annual actuarial valuation of the Fund and shall have the financial responsibility for maintaining the Fund on a generally accepted actuarial basis.

An actuarially determined employer contribution shall be calculated annually by the actuary using assumptions and a cost method approved by the Actuarial Standards Board of the American Academy of Actuaries and selected by the Board of Trustees.

Notwithstanding Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Board of Trustees may adopt a contribution policy that would recommend a contribution not less than the actuarially determined employer contribution.

The recommended employer contribution rate by the Board of Trustees each year shall not be less than the actuarially determined employer contribution.

The Department of Public Safety shall provide the Department of State Treasurer with any assistance required by the State Treasurer in carrying out the financial responsibilities of the State Treasurer or the Board of Trustees.

History.

2020-48, s. 1.7(b).

§ 127A-41.
Uniforms, arms and equipment.

The North Carolina National Guard shall, as far as practicable, be uniformed, armed, and equipped with the same type of uniforms, arms and equipment as is or shall be provided for the appropriate regular service.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 37; C.S., s. 6824; 1959, c. 218, s. 15; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-41.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 127B-31

by Session Laws 2019-161, s. 1(b), effective October 1, 2019.

History.

1997-153, s. 5; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “conduct a defense” for “conduct his defense” in subdivision (2).

§ 127A-41.2.
Operation of post exchanges.

The North Carolina National Guard is authorized to operate post exchanges.

The North Carolina National Guard is authorized to enter into agreements with the Army & Air Force Exchange Service to operate post exchanges.

History.

2007-60, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1.

§ 127A-42.
Distinguished Service Medal by Governor of North Carolina.

There is hereby created the North Carolina Distinguished Service Medal which shall be of appropriate design, and a ribbon, together with a rosette or other device to be worn in lieu thereof. This medal and appurtenances thereto shall be of a design approved by the Governor. Upon the recommendation of the Secretary of Public Safety and a board consisting of the Adjutant General and all other general officers and officers assigned to authorized general-officer-grade vacancies of the North Carolina National Guard, the Governor is authorized to present the medal to any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States discharged under honorable conditions, who has distinguished himself or herself by exceptionally meritorious conduct in the performance of outstanding service to the North Carolina National Guard. The Governor, on the Governor’s own authority, may award the medal to the Secretary of Public Safety, the Adjutant General, or any other active or inactive general officer or flag officer of the Armed Forces of the United States who has distinguished himself or herself by especially meritorious conduct in the performance of his or her duties.

History.

1955, c. 255, s. 2; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1973, c. 1124; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 230, s. 1; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” twice in the third sentence.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in the last two sentences.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, throughout the section, made minor stylistic and gender neutralizing changes; in the last two sentences, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “armed forces”; and in the last sentence, inserted “or flag officer.”

§ 127A-43.
North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Service Medal.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Service Medal which shall be of appropriate design, and a ribbon, together with a rosette or other device to be worn in lieu thereof. This medal and appurtenances thereto shall be of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Governor or the Governor’s designee is authorized to award this medal upon the recommendation of the Secretary of Public Safety in consultation with the Adjutant General and a board of officers appointed by the Adjutant General. Any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States discharged under honorable conditions, who has distinguished himself or herself by heroism, meritorious achievement, or meritorious service to the North Carolina National Guard, is eligible for this award. The Governor, on the Governor’s own authority, may award the medal to the Secretary of Public Safety, the Adjutant General or any other active or inactive general officer or flag officer of the Armed Forces of the United States who has distinguished himself or herself by heroism, meritorious achievement, or meritorious service to the North Carolina National Guard. The required heroism, achievement, or service, while of a lesser degree than that required for awarding of the North Carolina Distinguished Service Medal, must nevertheless be accomplished with distinction.

History.

1973, c. 966, s. 1; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 230, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the third and fourth sentences.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in the third and fifth sentences.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the second and third sentences, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative,” in the fourth and fifth sentences, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “armed forces” and inserted “or herself,” and in the fifth sentence, inserted “or flag officer” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-44.
North Carolina National Guard Commendation Medal.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Commendation Medal which shall be of appropriate design, and a ribbon, together with a rosette or other device to be worn in lieu thereof. This medal and appurtenances thereto shall be of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General of North Carolina or the Adjutant General’s designee, who shall not be below the rank of colonel (O-6), may award this medal. Any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States discharged under honorable conditions, who distinguishes himself or herself by example or the performance of a specific act in behalf of the North Carolina National Guard, is eligible for this award.

History.

1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 230, s. 3; 1991, c. 367, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the second and third sentences, substituted “the Governor’s designee” and “the Adjutant General’s designee,” respectively for “his designated representative,” and in the last sentence, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “armed forces” and “distinguishes himself or herself by example” for “distinguishes himself by his example.”

§ 127A-44.1.
North Carolina National Guard Achievement Medal.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Achievement Medal which shall be of appropriate design, and a ribbon, together with a rosette or other device to be worn in lieu thereof. This medal and appurtenances thereto shall be of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General of North Carolina or the Adjutant General’s designee, who shall not be below the rank of lieutenant colonel (O-5), may award this medal. Any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States discharged under honorable conditions, who distinguishes himself or herself by example or the performance of a specific act in behalf of the North Carolina National Guard, is eligible for this award.

History.

1991, c. 367, s. 3; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the second and third sentences, substituted “the Governor’s designee” and “the Adjutant General’s designee,” respectively for “his designated representative,” and in the last sentence, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “armed forces” and “distinguishes himself or herself by example” for “distinguishes himself by his example.”

§ 127A-45.
North Carolina National Guard State Active Duty Award.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard State Active Duty Award which shall be a ribbon of appropriate design. This ribbon and appurtenances thereto shall be of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General of North Carolina may present this ribbon to members of the North Carolina National Guard who, by order of the Governor, satisfactorily serve a tour of State active duty. To be worthy of this award, the nature of the tour of State active duty must have been a distinct and notable service to the State or to a community, as determined by the Adjutant General of North Carolina. On or after July 1, 1991, this award may also be presented to active guard personnel and reserve personnel who satisfactorily participate in tours of State active duty.

History.

1973, c. 966, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1991, c. 367, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative” in the second sentence.

§ 127A-45.1.
North Carolina National Guard Governor’s Unit Citation.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Governor’s Unit Citation which shall be a streamer, a unit emblem, and a certificate, all of appropriate design as approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Governor or the Governor’s designee is authorized to present the unit citation, upon recommendation of the Adjutant General, subject to the approval of the Secretary, to any unit of North Carolina National Guard distinguishing itself by extraordinary heroism or meritorious service while in a State active duty status. The unit must display such gallantry, determination, and esprit de corps in accomplishing its mission under conditions which set it apart and above other units.

History.

1977, c. 229, s. 1; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the first and second sentences, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative,” and in the second sentence, made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-45.2.
North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Unit Citation.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Unit Citation which shall be a streamer, a unit emblem, and a certificate, all of appropriate design as approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General is authorized to present this citation to any unit of the North Carolina National Guard distinguishing itself through heroism or meritorious service to the State of North Carolina. The required heroism or meritorious service, while of a lesser degree than that required for the award of the North Carolina National Guard Governor’s Unit Citation, must nevertheless have been accomplished with distinction.

History.

1977, c. 229, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative” in the first sentence, and made a minor stylistic change in the second sentence.

§ 127A-45.2A.
North Carolina National Guard Outstanding Unit Award.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Outstanding Unit Award which shall be a streamer, a unit emblem, and a certificate, all of appropriate design as approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General may present this citation to any unit of the North Carolina National Guard distinguishing itself through meritorious achievement or service to the State of North Carolina. The required meritorious service, while of a lesser degree than that required for the award of the North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Unit Citation, must nevertheless have been accomplished with distinction.

History.

1991, c. 367, s. 4; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative” in the first sentence.

§ 127A-45.3.
North Carolina National Guard Distinguished Civilian Service Medal.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Distinguished Civilian Service Medal which shall be of appropriate design, rosette or other device to be worn in lieu thereof, and citation certificate, of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Governor or the Governor’s designee is authorized to award this medal upon the recommendation of the Adjutant General of North Carolina and a board of officers and noncommissioned officers appointed by the Adjutant General, to United States citizens and governmental officials at the policy development level who render distinguished service to the North Carolina National Guard.

History.

1977, c. 796; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” at the end of the last sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, twice substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative.”

§ 127A-45.4.
North Carolina National Guard Outstanding Civilian Service Medal.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Outstanding Civilian Service Medal which shall be of appropriate design, rosette or other device to be worn in lieu thereof, and citation certificate, of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General of North Carolina is authorized to award this medal upon the recommendation of a board of officers and noncommissioned officers, appointed by the Adjutant General, to United States citizens and governmental officials who render outstanding service to the North Carolina National Guard.

History.

1977, c. 796; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” at the end of the last sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designated representative” in the first sentence.

§ 127A-45.5.
North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Civilian Service Award.

There is hereby created the North Carolina National Guard Meritorious Civilian Service Award which shall consist of a certificate of a design approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designee. The Adjutant General of North Carolina or the Adjutant General’s designee, who shall not be below the grade of general officer, is authorized to confer this award. This award may be granted to individuals, organizations, corporations, associations and other groups, making a substantial contribution to the North Carolina National Guard.

History.

1977, c. 796; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the first and second sentences, substituted “the Governor’s designee” and “the Adjutant General’s designee,” respectively for “his designated representative” and “a designated representative,” respectively.

§ 127A-45.5A.
Other awards.

The Adjutant General may, from time to time, create other awards and medals to recognize meritorious service or outstanding achievement. The creation of the awards and medals shall be approved by the Governor. The Governor or the Governor’s designee shall approve the design of the awards and medals.

History.

1991, c. 367, s. 5; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the first sentence, deleted “such” following “create,” in the last two sentences, substituted “the awards” for “such awards,” and in the last sentence, substituted “the Governor’s designee” for “his designee.”

§ 127A-46.
Authority to wear medals, ribbons and other awards.

The Adjutant General may prescribe those medals, ribbons and other awards and decorations that may be worn by members of the militia, not inconsistent with regulations of the respective Armed Forces of the United States.

History.

1939, c. 344; 1959, c. 218, s. 16; 1967, c. 563, s. 4; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed services” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-47.
Courts-martial for National Guard.

Courts-martial for military personnel of the North Carolina National Guard not in the service of the United States shall be of three kinds, namely, general courts-martial, special courts-martial, and summary courts-martial. They shall be constituted, have cognizance of the same subjects, and possess like powers as similar courts provided for by the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States. The proceedings of courts-martial of the North Carolina National Guard shall follow the forms and modes of procedure prescribed for such similar courts.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 55; C.S., s. 6825; 1963, c. 1018, s. 1; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-48.
General courts-martial.

General courts-martial for military personnel of the North Carolina National Guard not in the service of the United States may be convened by orders of the Governor of the State or of the Adjutant General, and these courts shall have the power to impose punishments in like manner and to the extent prescribed by the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be in use by the Armed Forces of the United States at the time of the offense, except that (i) no court shall have the authority to impose confinement as part of the sentence unless the court consisted of a military judge and not less than five members, except that a defendant who requests a military judge alone may be sentenced to confinement, and (ii) no court shall have the authority to impose confinement in excess of one year and one day as part of a sentence.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 56; C.S., s. 6826; 1957, c. 136, s. 7; 1963, c. 1018, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).